Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 1
P

HOSPHATES

12-4-100. Licenses to dig, mine, and remove phosphate deposits; restrictions on license holders.

Whenever any person discovers phosphate rock or phosphatic deposits in the navigable streams or waters of this state or in any public land on their banks or margins and files with the Secretary of State notice of such discovery and a description of the location thereof, he shall be entitled to receive from the Secretary of State a license giving him or his assigns the exclusive right, for ten years from the date of the license, of digging, mining, and removing from such location and from an area for a distance of five miles in any or all directions therefrom the phosphate rock and phosphatic deposits that may be found therein, provided that persons receiving or holding such licenses shall in no way interfere with the free navigation of the streams and waters or the private rights of any citizen residing on or owning the lands upon the banks of such navigable rivers and waters; provided, further, that as long as the license remains in effect, no person, natural or artificial, shall have the privilege of locating a claim within 20 miles of any other claim for which he has received a license.

(Ga. L. 1884-85, p. 125, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 1726; Civil Code 1910, § 1977; Code 1933, § 43-401.)

12-4-101. Annual mining fee; license fee; affidavit and bond.

Licenses shall be granted upon the express condition that the grantees shall pay to the Office of the State Treasurer the sum of $1.00 per ton for every ton of phosphate rock and phosphatic deposit mined and removed from the navigable rivers and waters of this state and the banks and margins thereof. This sum shall be paid on October 1 of every year and shall cover the amount of phosphate rock and phosphatic deposit mined and removed during the preceding year.

An applicant shall pay to the Office of the State Treasurer the sum of $100.00 as a license fee before commencing business.

Before commencing operations, a license holder shall file or cause to be filed with the Office of the State Treasurer an affidavit and bond in the penal sum of $20,000.00. The affidavit and bond shall be approved by the Attorney General and shall be conditioned on the holder's making true and faithful reports to the Office of the State Treasurer annually on or before October 1, or more frequently if required by the Office of the State Treasurer, of the number of tons of phosphate rock and phosphatic deposits mined and removed by the holder from the beds of the navigable streams and waters and the banks or margins thereof and also conditioned on the holder's punctually paying to the Office of the State Treasurer the sum required by subsection (a) of this Code section.

(Ga. L. 1884-85, p. 125, §§ 2, 3; Civil Code 1895, §§ 1727, 1728; Civil Code 1910, §§ 1978, 1979; Code 1933, §§ 43-402, 43-403; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1402, § 18; Ga. L. 2010, p. 863, § 2/SB 296.)

12-4-102. Lapse of license.

Any license granted under this part shall lapse and become void unless within three years from the date of the granting of the license the privileges granted shall be utilized and work in good faith shall be commenced.

(Ga. L. 1884-85, p. 125, § 5; Civil Code 1895, § 1729; Civil Code 1910, § 1980; Code 1933, § 43-404.)

12-4-103. Penalty.

Any person who is not engaged in the prosecution of lawfully authorized searches and who digs, mines, removes, or cleanses phosphate rock or phosphatic deposits from the beds of the navigable streams of this state or from any public lands on the banks and margins thereof without having first obtained a license as required by Code Section 12-4-100 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(Ga. L. 1884-85, p. 125, § 4; Penal Code 1895, § 203; Penal Code 1910, § 201; Code 1933, § 43-9902.)